src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k32_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ryggur
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: rygg
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: ryggi
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: [ryggjar, rygs]
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: ryggir
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: ryggir
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: ryggjum
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: ryggja
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: ryggurin
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: ryggin
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: rygginum
    ryggur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: [ryggjarins, rygsins]
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: ryggirnir
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: ryggirnar
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: ryggjunum
    ryggur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: ryggjanna
